Utah statutes.
34-29-10.   Schedule of fees -- Fee limitations.

(1) (a) A private employment agency shall maintain a schedule of fees to be charged and collected in the conduct of its business.

(b) A private employment agency shall post the schedule described in Subsection (1)(a) in a conspicuous place in the private employment agency.

(c) A private employment agency may change the schedule described in Subsection (1)(a), but a change is not effective until the amended schedule is posted in accordance with Subsection (1)(b).

(2)  A private employment agency may not charge or collect a fee that is greater than:

(a)  the fee on the schedule of fees in effect at the time the contract for employment is issued; or

(b) 25% of the amount actually earned in the employment during the first 30 days, if the employment ends during the 30-day period.



Amended by Chapter 240, 2008 General Session

